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CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC P0705 Transmission Range Sensor Circuit Mal-
function (PRNDL Input)

DTC P0850 Park/Neutral Switch Input Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The neutral start switch detects the shift lever range and sends signals to the Engine and ECT ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P0705

(2−tripdetection logic)
SAll switchesareOFFsimultaneously forP,R,N,D,3and2
ranges.
S2ormoreswitchesareONsimultaneously forP,R,N, (D4),
3 and (2 L) ranges.

SShort inneutral start switchcircuit
SNeutral start switch

P0850

Neutral start switch remainesON(P,Nrange)duringdriving
underconditions (a)and (b) for30sec. (2 −tripdetection logic)
(a) Vehicle speed: 70 km/h (44 mph) or more
(b)Enginespeed: 1,500 − 2,500 rpm

S Neutralstart switch
SEngineandECTECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check neutral start switch.

PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Disconnect the neutral start switch connector.
CHECK:
Check continuity between each terminal shown below when the
shift lever is moved to each range.
OK:

Shift range Terminal No. to continuity Terminal No. to continuity

P 1 − 3 6 − 9

R 2 − 3 −

N 3 − 5 6 − 9

D, 4 3 − 7 −

3 3 − 4 −

2, L 3 − 8 −

NG Replace neutral start switch
(See page AT−7) .

OK
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2 Check transmission control switch.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the neutral start switch connector.
(b) Disconnect t he shif t lock c ont r ol c om put er connect or

(transmission control switch).
CHECK:
Check continuity between each terminal of shift lock control
computer (transmission control switch).
OK:

Shift range Tester connection Specified valve

D
1 8 (NSSD AT4)

No continuity

4
1 − 8 (NSSD − AT4)

Continuity

2
6 12 (NSSL ATL)

No continuity

L
6 − 12 (NSSL − ATL)

Continuity

NG Replace the transmission control switch
(See page AT−21).

OK
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3 Measure voltage between each terminals of NSW, P, R, N, D, 4, 3, 2, L and E1 of
Engine and ECT ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the shift lock control computer connector (trans-

mission control switch).
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between each terminals NSW, P, R, N, D, 4,
3, 2, L and E1 of Engine and ECT ECU when the shift lever is
shifted to the following ranges.

OK:

Tester connection Condition Specified condition

NSW B d  d
Shift lever range: P and N Below 1 V

NSW − Body ground
Shift lever range: Except P and N Battery voltage

P− Body ground Shift lever range: P Battery voltage

R − Body ground Shift lever range: R Battery voltage*

N − Body ground Shift lever range: N Battery voltage

D − Body ground Shift lever range: D and 4 Battery voltage

4 − Body ground Shift lever range: 4 Battery voltage

3 − Body ground Shift lever range: 3 Battery voltage

2 − Body ground Shift lever range: 2 and L Battery voltage

L − Body ground Shift lever range: L Battery voltage

HINT:
*: The voltage will drop slightly due to lighting up of the back up
light.

OK Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−38).

NG

Repair or replace the harness or connector
(See page IN−38).


